browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4252 Y 1
SFX 4252 0 orisass .
SFX 2413 Y 1
SFX 2413 0 tara .
SFX 3972 Y 1
SFX 3972 0 tard .
SFX 4431 Y 1
SFX 4431 0 lettas .
SFX 3020 Y 1
SFX 3020 0 tari .
SFX 149 Y 1
SFX 149 0 issan .
SFX 147 Y 1
SFX 147 0 issas .
SFX 158 Y 1
SFX 158 0 tass .
SFX 2242 Y 1
SFX 2242 0 gls .
SFX 3522 Y 1
SFX 3522 0 cedan .
SFX 3521 Y 1
SFX 3521 0 cedas .
SFX 4249 Y 1
SFX 4249 0 orisava .
SFX 1546 Y 1
SFX 1546 0 idain .
SFX 1545 Y 1
SFX 1545 0 idais .
SFX 4986 Y 1
SFX 4986 0 arina .
SFX 1174 Y 1
SFX 1174 0 gna .
SFX 2390 Y 1
SFX 2390 0 turescha .
SFX 3386 Y 1
SFX 3386 0 etar .
SFX 1576 Y 1
SFX 1576 0 abels .
SFX 157 Y 1
SFX 157 0 tava .
SFX 3496 Y 1
SFX 3496 0 chenta .
SFX 3333 Y 1
SFX 3333 0 gol .
SFX 3332 Y 1
SFX 3332 0 gon .
SFX 1734 Y 1
SFX 1734 0 gnai .
SFX 1917 Y 1
SFX 1917 0 gnan .
SFX 1552 Y 1
SFX 1552 0 gnar .
SFX 1287 Y 1
SFX 1287 0 gnas .
SFX 202 Y 1
SFX 202 0 ià .
SFX 95 Y 1
SFX 95 0 issem .
SFX 3652 Y 1
SFX 3652 0 vaiders .
SFX 1117 Y 1
SFX 1117 0 schend .
SFX 3520 Y 1
SFX 3520 0 ceder .
SFX 3078 Y 1
SFX 3078 0 schent .
SFX 2198 Y 1
SFX 2198 0 itgà .
SFX 1856 Y 1
SFX 1856 0 nella .
SFX 3895 Y 1
SFX 3895 0 tivà .
SFX 4724 Y 1
SFX 4724 0 està .
SFX 4710 Y 1
SFX 4710 0 eter .
SFX 1319 Y 1
SFX 1319 0 urassan .
SFX 1318 Y 1
SFX 1318 0 urassas .
SFX 1928 Y 1
SFX 1928 0 etsch .
SFX 800 Y 1
SFX 800 0 chadas .
SFX 958 Y 1
SFX 958 0 ivitad .
SFX 3385 Y 1
SFX 3385 0 etga .
SFX 3517 Y 1
SFX 3517 0 cedia .
SFX 3511 Y 1
SFX 3511 0 cedin .
SFX 1410 Y 1
SFX 1410 0 ac .
SFX 1575 Y 1
SFX 1575 0 ad .
SFX 3509 Y 1
SFX 3509 0 cedis .
SFX 32 Y 1
SFX 32 0 ai .
SFX 78 Y 1
SFX 78 0 al .
SFX 1769 Y 1
SFX 1769 0 am .
SFX 4 Y 1
SFX 4 0 an .
SFX 4991 Y 1
SFX 4991 0 ap .
SFX 33 Y 1
SFX 33 0 ar .
SFX 3 Y 1
SFX 3 0 as .
SFX 177 Y 1
SFX 177 0 at .
SFX 3552 Y 1
SFX 3552 0 au .
SFX 4962 Y 1
SFX 4962 0 av .
SFX 3548 Y 1
SFX 3548 0 az .
SFX 3331 Y 1
SFX 3331 0 gul .
SFX 2674 Y 1
SFX 2674 0 gun .
SFX 948 Y 1
SFX 948 0 mavan .
SFX 947 Y 1
SFX 947 0 mavas .
SFX 1406 Y 1
SFX 1406 0 ba .
SFX 4923 Y 1
SFX 4923 0 bilisavan .
SFX 4032 Y 1
SFX 4032 0 siunà .
SFX 3543 Y 1
SFX 3543 0 bo .
SFX 776 Y 1
SFX 776 0 schess .
SFX 4922 Y 1
SFX 4922 0 bilisavas .
SFX 4909 Y 1
SFX 4909 0 bs .
SFX 2291 Y 1
SFX 2291 0 etic .
SFX 2373 Y 1
SFX 2373 0 uraziun .
SFX 2401 Y 1
SFX 2401 0 tinian .
SFX 2989 Y 1
SFX 2989 0 tinias .
SFX 1970 Y 1
SFX 1970 0 zzond .
SFX 203 Y 1
SFX 203 0 ca .
SFX 290 Y 1
SFX 290 0 ch .
SFX 1760 Y 1
SFX 1760 0 co .
SFX 3408 Y 1
SFX 3408 0 erlà .
SFX 759 Y 1
SFX 759 0 cs .
SFX 3464 Y 1
SFX 3464 0 ct .
SFX 4356 Y 1
SFX 4356 0 mustgas .
SFX 1915 Y 1
SFX 1915 0 gnia .
SFX 2367 Y 1
SFX 2367 0 vai .
SFX 3651 Y 1
SFX 3651 0 val .
SFX 3336 Y 1
SFX 3336 0 gnim .
SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18 0 van .
SFX 2022 Y 1
SFX 2022 0 var .
SFX 16 Y 1
SFX 16 0 vas .
SFX 4902 Y 1
SFX 4902 0 chader .
SFX 1712 Y 1
SFX 1712 0 idass .
SFX 630 Y 1
SFX 630 0 aivladad .
SFX 12 Y 1
SFX 12 0 da .
SFX 234 Y 1
SFX 234 0 di .
SFX 4554 Y 1
SFX 4554 0 igraf .
SFX 3449 Y 1
SFX 3449 0 do .
SFX 3448 Y 1
SFX 3448 0 dr .
SFX 24 Y 1
SFX 24 0 ds .
SFX 3797 Y 1
SFX 3797 0 tunai .
SFX 2962 Y 1
SFX 2962 0 tunar .
SFX 3794 Y 1
SFX 3794 0 tunas .
SFX 3400 Y 1
SFX 3400 0 erlassan .
SFX 3399 Y 1
SFX 3399 0 erlassas .
SFX 1924 Y 1
SFX 1924 0 gescha .
SFX 817 Y 1
SFX 817 0 scheva .
SFX 1759 Y 1
SFX 1759 0 ea .
SFX 3439 Y 1
SFX 3439 0 ed .
SFX 105 Y 1
SFX 105 0 el .
SFX 1180 Y 1
SFX 1180 0 em .
SFX 381 Y 1
SFX 381 0 en .
SFX 57 Y 1
SFX 57 0 er .
SFX 1560 Y 1
SFX 1560 0 es .
SFX 102 Y 1
SFX 102 0 et .
SFX 4695 Y 1
SFX 4695 0 ev .
SFX 917 Y 1
SFX 917 0 ez .
SFX 3416 Y 1
SFX 3416 0 ellins .
SFX 3300 Y 1
SFX 3300 0 ignadas .
SFX 720 Y 1
SFX 720 0 fa .
SFX 2611 Y 1
SFX 2611 0 irescha .
SFX 1709 Y 1
SFX 1709 0 idava .
SFX 758 Y 1
SFX 758 0 dassan .
SFX 757 Y 1
SFX 757 0 dassas .
SFX 363 Y 1
SFX 363 0 ga .
SFX 4677 Y 1
SFX 4677 0 ge .
SFX 785 Y 1
SFX 785 0 gi .
SFX 423 Y 1
SFX 423 0 gl .
SFX 1553 Y 1
SFX 1553 0 gn .
SFX 1912 Y 1
SFX 1912 0 go .
SFX 784 Y 1
SFX 784 0 gs .
SFX 4642 Y 1
SFX 4642 0 hettada .
SFX 236 Y 1
SFX 236 0 vel .
SFX 1777 Y 1
SFX 1777 0 ver .
SFX 4640 Y 1
SFX 4640 0 hettads .
SFX 3265 Y 1
SFX 3265 0 inissem .
SFX 451 Y 1
SFX 451 0 inada .
SFX 532 Y 1
SFX 532 0 inads .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 0 ia .
SFX 67 Y 1
SFX 67 0 ic .
SFX 748 Y 1
SFX 748 0 id .
SFX 1276 Y 1
SFX 1276 0 ii .
SFX 556 Y 1
SFX 556 0 il .
SFX 194 Y 1
SFX 194 0 im .
SFX 10 Y 1
SFX 10 0 in .
SFX 1695 Y 1
SFX 1695 0 io .
SFX 151 Y 1
SFX 151 0 ir .
SFX 15 Y 1
SFX 15 0 is .
SFX 369 Y 1
SFX 369 0 it .
SFX 196 Y 1
SFX 196 0 iv .
SFX 4467 Y 1
SFX 4467 0 iz .
SFX 4894 Y 1
SFX 4894 0 chuna .
SFX 3367 Y 1
SFX 3367 0 fitgavan .
SFX 3366 Y 1
SFX 3366 0 fitgavas .
SFX 1871 Y 1
SFX 1871 0 ja .
SFX 4367 Y 1
SFX 4367 0 mpassan .
SFX 4366 Y 1
SFX 4366 0 mpassas .
SFX 3066 Y 1
SFX 3066 0 ssadas .
SFX 4019 Y 1
SFX 4019 0 siunesch .
SFX 2312 Y 1
SFX 2312 0 daziun .
SFX 2984 Y 1
SFX 2984 0 trà .
SFX 2892 Y 1
SFX 2892 0 vadas .
SFX 2359 Y 1
SFX 2359 0 vegnan .
SFX 839 Y 1
SFX 839 0 via .
SFX 2013 Y 1
SFX 2013 0 vis .
SFX 500 Y 1
SFX 500 0 aliseschan .
SFX 499 Y 1
SFX 499 0 aliseschas .
SFX 77 Y 1
SFX 77 0 la .
SFX 2593 Y 1
SFX 2593 0 le .
SFX 2592 Y 1
SFX 2592 0 li .
SFX 3732 Y 1
SFX 3732 0 unalas .
SFX 251 Y 1
SFX 251 0 ls .
SFX 4638 Y 1
SFX 4638 0 hettain .
SFX 4637 Y 1
SFX 4637 0 hettais .
SFX 436 Y 1
SFX 436 0 ma .
SFX 3213 Y 1
SFX 3213 0 mi .
SFX 3194 Y 1
SFX 3194 0 mp .
SFX 1860 Y 1
SFX 1860 0 ms .
SFX 3310 Y 1
SFX 3310 0 ideschan .
SFX 492 Y 1
SFX 492 0 inain .
SFX 3309 Y 1
SFX 3309 0 ideschas .
SFX 469 Y 1
SFX 469 0 inais .
SFX 188 Y 1
SFX 188 0 etta .
SFX 432 Y 1
SFX 432 0 tessan .
SFX 165 Y 1
SFX 165 0 na .
SFX 810 Y 1
SFX 810 0 seschan .
SFX 1219 Y 1
SFX 1219 0 tiseschan .
SFX 431 Y 1
SFX 431 0 tessas .
SFX 61 Y 1
SFX 61 0 nd .
SFX 4342 Y 1
SFX 4342 0 ne .
SFX 809 Y 1
SFX 809 0 seschas .
SFX 1218 Y 1
SFX 1218 0 tiseschas .
SFX 1046 Y 1
SFX 1046 0 ni .
SFX 3144 Y 1
SFX 3144 0 no .
SFX 352 Y 1
SFX 352 0 ns .
SFX 75 Y 1
SFX 75 0 nt .
SFX 540 Y 1
SFX 540 0 vla .
SFX 3897 Y 1
SFX 3897 0 tistic .
SFX 1482 Y 1
SFX 1482 0 neschian .
SFX 1481 Y 1
SFX 1481 0 neschias .
SFX 3137 Y 1
SFX 3137 0 oc .
SFX 1023 Y 1
SFX 1023 0 cheschan .
SFX 1022 Y 1
SFX 1022 0 cheschas .
SFX 944 Y 1
SFX 944 0 ol .
SFX 1131 Y 1
SFX 1131 0 om .
SFX 465 Y 1
SFX 465 0 on .
SFX 4266 Y 1
SFX 4266 0 op .
SFX 741 Y 1
SFX 741 0 or .
SFX 1045 Y 1
SFX 1045 0 os .
SFX 1000 Y 1
SFX 1000 0 ot .
SFX 3334 Y 1
SFX 3334 0 gnus .
SFX 261 Y 1
SFX 261 0 pa .
SFX 2537 Y 1
SFX 2537 0 pe .
SFX 1471 Y 1
SFX 1471 0 pi .
SFX 2623 Y 1
SFX 2623 0 inala .
SFX 1468 Y 1
SFX 1468 0 ps .
SFX 3760 Y 1
SFX 3760 0 udì .
SFX 2519 Y 1
SFX 2519 0 ppavan .
SFX 2518 Y 1
SFX 2518 0 ppavas .
SFX 4901 Y 1
SFX 4901 0 chadra .
SFX 1007 Y 1
SFX 1007 0 icher .
SFX 1667 Y 1
SFX 1667 0 iveschian .
SFX 190 Y 1
SFX 190 0 iada .
SFX 1666 Y 1
SFX 1666 0 iveschias .
SFX 220 Y 1
SFX 220 0 iads .
SFX 1105 Y 1
SFX 1105 0 uneschan .
SFX 1104 Y 1
SFX 1104 0 uneschas .
SFX 83 Y 1
SFX 83 0 ra .
SFX 4181 Y 1
SFX 4181 0 rc .
SFX 1348 Y 1
SFX 1348 0 rd .
SFX 575 Y 1
SFX 575 0 ologia .
SFX 900 Y 1
SFX 900 0 ologic .
SFX 257 Y 1
SFX 257 0 ri .
SFX 4168 Y 1
SFX 4168 0 rm .
SFX 3091 Y 1
SFX 3091 0 ro .
SFX 360 Y 1
SFX 360 0 rs .
SFX 1833 Y 1
SFX 1833 0 rt .
SFX 4142 Y 1
SFX 4142 0 ry .
SFX 3268 Y 1
SFX 3268 0 inant .
SFX 4447 Y 1
SFX 4447 0 lavà .
SFX 201 Y 1
SFX 201 0 sa .
SFX 734 Y 1
SFX 734 0 alissem .
SFX 1245 Y 1
SFX 1245 0 si .
SFX 4015 Y 1
SFX 4015 0 so .
SFX 14 Y 1
SFX 14 0 ss .
SFX 573 Y 1
SFX 573 0 st .
SFX 2358 Y 1
SFX 2358 0 vegnia .
SFX 2355 Y 1
SFX 2355 0 vegnin .
SFX 2135 Y 1
SFX 2135 0 orica .
SFX 2017 Y 1
SFX 2017 0 vegnir .
SFX 2353 Y 1
SFX 2353 0 vegnis .
SFX 4262 Y 1
SFX 4262 0 orics .
SFX 498 Y 1
SFX 498 0 aliseschia .
SFX 589 Y 1
SFX 589 0 lisassan .
SFX 588 Y 1
SFX 588 0 lisassas .
SFX 60 Y 1
SFX 60 0 ta .
SFX 168 Y 1
SFX 168 0 tavan .
SFX 1599 Y 1
SFX 1599 0 te .
SFX 167 Y 1
SFX 167 0 tavas .
SFX 327 Y 1
SFX 327 0 tg .
SFX 936 Y 1
SFX 936 0 ti .
SFX 1030 Y 1
SFX 1030 0 to .
SFX 180 Y 1
SFX 180 0 ts .
SFX 3967 Y 1
SFX 3967 0 tatsch .
SFX 1028 Y 1
SFX 1028 0 ua .
