browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.dic
are/78,165,217,1475,2242
demo/300,669,3870,3885,3892,3893,3895,4430,4914,4928,4932,4933,4935
estra/1,76,624,3332
exclus/3,5,958,1272
fier/1,3,5,303,1174,1287
gia/9,10,12,15,17,22,56,180,403,404,420,423,433,434,440,476,482,518,541,703,774,776,815,816,817,818,819,1020,1116,1117,1307,1336,1347,1468,1570,1609,1610,1794,1795,1856,1871,1937,1938,2037,2108,2180,2319,2380,2381,2382,2383,2532,2884,3077,3078,3112,3237,3802,3806,4658,4659
han/9,24,55,869,3331
inf/2140,4724
infinit/196,1575
intim/1,3,5,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,64,68,1375,1545,1546,1547,1705,1707,1708,1709,1710,1711,1712,1713,1714,1715,1716,3306,3307,3308,3309,3310,3311,3312,4590
leva/3972
l'ur/1,5,10,68,165,191,224,1757,1873,3457,4034,4710
met/4,5,57,60,78,82,138,140,142,143,159,164,173,175,185,217,225,325,339,401,402,419,429,430,431,432,1121,1167,1835,1849,3091,4175,4269,4270
munta/1483,1856,3334
nettegia/1,2,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,54,75,84,87,107,1788,2578,3652,4900
niv/3,5,77,78,105,132,156,210,222,223,227,230,253,627,1487,1661,2301,3417,3418,4431,4769,4770,4771,4772,4773,4774,4775,4776,4777,4778,4779,4780,4781
Nova/1287
oct/4,37,80,102,1849,2030,3416,3686,4962,4996,4997
palpa/1552,1725,1726,1727,1728,1729,1730,1731,1732,1733,1734,1735,1736,1737,1738,3456
pas/30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,56,70,154,180,185,290,607,954,1029,1040,1208,1339,1340,1404,1939,2057,2079,3476,3477,3478,3479,3480,3481,3482,3483,3484,3485,3486,3487,3488,3489,3490,3491,3492,3493,3494,3495,3496,4432
past/2541,3125,3285,3387,4238,4239,4240,4241,4242,4243,4244,4247,4248,4249,4250,4251,4252,4253,4254,4255,4256,4257,4258,4259,4260,4264
perf/1204,1314,1315,1316,1318,1319,1321,1322,1323,1324,1325,1326,1756,2306,2373,3385,3661,3663
pitg/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,70,86,105,144,194,196,1639,1848,2847,3563,4986
pla/9,10,56,143,180,196,303,337,351,368,606,634,776,791,792,793,815,816,817,818,819,832,833,834,835,1069,1095,1117,1312,1347,1587,1871,1937,1985,2032,2093,2108,2180,2394,3607,3802,3867,4463,4464
pos/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,201,365,374,392,628,699,706,729,730,760,775,795,796,797,798,799,800,801,854,941,1021,1022,1023,1024,1025,1194,1195,1368,1602,1764,1768,1937,2596,2602,3604
quit/34,44,138,140,142,150,157,158,160,161,163,166,167,168,169,170,171,316,317,318,319,320,332,333,1112,3552,3973
raga/1552,1725,1738,3336
recuvr/3,4,5,6,7,8,9,10,15,71,72,73,74,86,105,135,145,147,148,149,151,152
renasch/10,15,57,71,72,73,74,86,135,145,147,148,149,152,719
rent/1576
revend/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,57,71,72,73,74,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,309,782,826,1677,2185,2186,2187,2188,2189,2190,2191,2192,2193,2194,2195,2196,2197,2198,3244,3245,3246,3247,3248,3249,3250,3325
sav/5,6,30,31,71,72,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,144,326,368,443,472,737,994,1054,1755,1790,1928,2652,3697
schurnal/95,325,781
sdratsch/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,4430
sec/56,60,185,607,1571,1583,2701,3020,3127
ses/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,57,71,72,73,74,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,136,195,254,890,1364,1769,4782
signa/2413
smagl/202
soci/5,98,154,183,575,900,928,1001,1473,1846,3386,4711
stgav/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,70,153,183,1639,1848,2141,2225,2301,3547,3548,4282,4283,4284,4285
stilet/150,157,158,160,161,163,166,167,168,169,170,171,316,317,318,319,320,332,333
sultg/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44
sum/903,1410,1753
surs/82,138,140,142,150,160,161,163,166,171,401,402,429,430,431,432,806,1787,2237,2775,3019,3333,4648
svutr/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,70,105
tacl/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,105,191,516
telefon/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,10,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,67,70,88,99,177,303,370
teor/6,1180,1406
tsch/5,31,32,67,165,181,286,400,741,911,1018,1027,1092,1392,1756,1909,1932,1967,2199,2324,2325,2742,2792,2842,2843,2844,3391,3423,3436,3565,3566,3569,3570,3571,3572,3573,3574,3576,3577,3578,3605,3757,4266,4587,4991
